Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 2. Comprehensive State Plan for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

§ 37.2-315.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 264, cl. 2.

History.

1998, c. 680, § 37.1-48.1; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, c. 458; repealed by 2022, c. 264.

Editor's note.

Former §

37.2-315

, pertaining to the Comprehensive State Plan for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, derived from Acts 1998, c. 680, § 37.1-48.1; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, c. 458.